Alabama, session 2026rs, HB599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Farm-to-Market Value Chain Development Act.
Section 2. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Agriculture and
Industries.
(2) ELIGIBLE PRODUCER. A farmer, rancher, or
agricultural cooperative engaged in commercial food or fiber
production.
(3) VALUE CHAIN INFRASTRUCTURE. Includes cold storage,
aggregation facilities, processing equipment, packaging tools,
and transport assets.
Section 3. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer a grant program for eligible producers for:
(1) Cold storage and refrigeration systems;
Page 2

(1) Cold storage and refrigeration systems;
HB599 INTRODUCED
(2) Small-scale value-added processing equipment; and
(3) Packing and washing stations.
(b) Grants may not exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) per applicant and shall require at least a 25
percent cost share.
Section 4. (a) The department shall offer training and
assistance to eligible producers in:
(1) Business development and accounting;
(2) Regulatory compliance and food safety
certifications; and
(3) E-commerce and direct sales strategies.
(b) Services may be delivered through regional
extension offices or contracted providers.
Section 5. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department may provide matching
funds to eligible producers for:
(1) Launching sales to new retail or wholesale
accounts;
(2) Participating in farmers markets or institutional
procurement programs; and
(3) Branding and marketing campaigns.
(b) Awards shall not exceed twenty five thousand
dollars ($25,000) per project.
Section 6. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall provide planning
and construction grants to nonprofits, local governments, and
cooperatives for:
(1) Regional food hubs;
Page 3

(1) Regional food hubs;
HB599 INTRODUCED
(2) Shared-use commercial kitchens; and
(3) Distribution centers serving local producers.
(b) Facilities shall serve at least five independent
producers and meet food safety requirements.
Section 7. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish a
revolving loan or loan guarantee fund for capital investment
in value chain infrastructure.
(b) Loans shall have favorable terms and may support:
(1) Equipment purchases;
(2) Facility construction or retrofits; and
(3) Transport vehicle acquisition.
Section 8. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2027.
Page 4